client/braille/liblouis/tables/da-dk-g26.ctb
# vef
nofor before nondigletter begword vef 3456-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vefa 3456-124-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vefe 3456-124-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vefi 3456-124-24

# veg
nofor before nondigletter begword veg 3456-1245
nofor before nondigletter begword vega 3456-1245-1
nofor sufword vege 3456-12456
nofor sufword vegen 3456-1245-126
nofor word veget 3456-1245-346
nofor sufword vegger 3456-1245-1245-156
nofor before nondigletter begword vegi 3456-1245-24
nofor sufword vegst 3456-1245-1356

# veh
nofor before nondigletter begword veh 3456-125
nofor before nondigletter begword veha 3456-125-1
nofor sufword vehand 3456-125-1-12345
nofor sufword vehage 3456-125-1-23456
nofor before nondigletter begword vehe 3456-125-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vehi 3456-125-24

# vei
nofor before nondigletter begword vei 3456-24
nofor before nondigletter begword veibe 3456-24-12-15
nofor sufword veide 3456-24-1456
nofor sufword veien 3456-24-126
nofor sufword veige 3456-24-12456
nofor before nondigletter begword veij 3456-24-245
nofor sufword veind 3456-24-12345

# vej
nofor before nondigletter begword vej 3456-245
nofor before nondigletter begword veja 3456-245-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejadga 3456-245-1-145-1245-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejaf 3456-245-1-124
nofor sufword vejafde 3456-245-1-124-1456
nofor before nondigletter begword vejafgif 3456-245-1-124-1245-24-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vejb 3456-245-12
nofor before nondigletter begword vejba 3456-245-12-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejbe 3456-245-12-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vejbi 3456-245-12-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vejbid 3456-245-12-24-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vejc 3456-245-14
nofor before nondigletter begword vejd 3456-245-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vejda 3456-245-145-1
nofor sufword vejde 3456-245-1456
nofor before nondigletter begword vejdi 3456-245-145-24
nofor before nondigletter begword veje 3456-245-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vejea 3456-245-15-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejeb 3456-245-15-12
nofor before nondigletter begword vejed 3456-245-15-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vejeda 3456-245-15-145-1
nofor sufword vejede 3456-245-15-1456
nofor before nondigletter begword vejef 3456-245-15-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vejeg 3456-245-15-1245
nofor sufword vejege 3456-245-15-12456
nofor sufword vejen 3456-245-126
nofor sufword vejene 3456-245-15-1246
nofor sufword vejer 3456-245-156
nofor word vejet 3456-245-346
nofor before nondigletter begword vejf 3456-245-124
nofor before nondigletter begword vejfa 3456-245-124-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejfe 3456-245-124-15
nofor sufword vejfest 3456-245-124-15-1356
nofor before nondigletter begword vejfi 3456-245-124-24
nofor begword vejfor 3456-245-124-1346
nofor before nondigletter begword vejg 3456-245-1245
nofor before nondigletter begword vejga 3456-245-1245-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejgaa 3456-245-1245-1-1
nofor sufword vejge 3456-245-12456
nofor before nondigletter begword vejgi 3456-245-1245-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vejh 3456-245-125
nofor before nondigletter begword vejha 3456-245-125-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejhe 3456-245-125-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vejhi 3456-245-125-24
nofor sufword vejhist 3456-245-125-24-1356
nofor before nondigletter begword vejhj 3456-245-125-245
nofor before nondigletter begword veji 3456-245-24
nofor before nondigletter begword vejid 3456-245-24-145
nofor before nondigletter begword vejj 3456-245-245
nofor before nondigletter begword vejja 3456-245-245-1
nofor before nondigletter begword vejje 3456-245-245-15
nofor before nondigletter begword vejji 3456-245-245-24
nofor sufword vejor 3456-245-1346
nofor begword vejst 3456-245-1356

nofor always vend 3456-12345
nofor always veor 3456-1346
nofor always vest 3456-1356
nofor always vete 3456-1256

# Corrections of letters with accents
nofor sufword aïda 1-5-24-145-1
nofor sufword anaïs 1-1345-1-5-24-234
nofor sufword antonín 1-1345-2345-135-1345-5-24-1345
nofor sufword château 14-125-5-1-1256-1-136
nofor sufword citroën 14-24-2345-1235-135-5-15-1345
nofor sufword dvořák 145-1236-135-5-1235-5-1-13
nofor sufword márquez 134-5-1-1235-56-12345-136-15-56-1356
nofor sufword miró 134-24-1235-5-135
nofor sufword tórshavn 2345-5-135-1235-234-125-1-1236-1345
nofor sufword václav 1236-5-1-14-123-1-1236

# Common combinations of one word contractions with slash
word af/på 356-34-1234
word du/i 145-34-24
word eller/og 15-34-14
word fra/til 235-34-2345
word han/hun 13456-34-136
word hun/han 136-34-13456
word i/du 24-34-145
word og/eller 14-34-15
word over/under 1346-34-12345
word på/af 1234-34-356
word til/fra 2345-34-235
word under/over 12345-34-1346

# no backtrans of ^1 and `2. use contractions
nofor always eta 346-1
nofor always etb 346-12
always etc 346-14

# Ensure no one-letter word contraction before or after a dash
prfword -af 36-1-124
sufword af- 1-124-36
prfword -altid 36-1-2345-145
sufword altid- 1-2345-145-36
prfword -at 36-1-2345
prfword -a 36-56-1
sufword at- 1-2345-36
prfword -og 36-135-1245
prfword -c 36-56-14
sufword og- 135-1245-36
prfword -du 36-145-136
prfword -d 36-56-145
sufword du- 145-136-36
prfword -efter 36-15-124-2345-156
prfword -z 36-56-1356
sufword efter- 15-124-2345-156-36
midword -efter- 36-1356-36
prfword -e 36-56-15
prfword -for 36-124-1346
prfword -f 36-56-124
sufword for- 124-1346-36
prfword -fra 36-124-1235-1
sufword fra- 124-1235-1-36
prfword -g 36-56-1245
prfword -gennem 36-1245-126-1246-134
sufword gennem- 1245-126-1246-134-36
prfword -ham 36-125-1-134
sufword ham- 125-1-134-36
prfword -han 36-125-1-1345
prfword -y 36-56-13456
sufword han- 125-1-1345-36
prfword -har 36-125-1-1235
prfword -h 36-56-125
sufword har- 125-1-1235-36
prfword -hun 36-125-136-1345
prfword -u 36-56-136
sufword hun- 125-136-1345-36
prfword -j 36-56-245
prfword -kan 36-13-1-1345
prfword -k 36-56-13
sufword kan- 13-1-1345-36
prfword -lige 36-123-24-12456
prfword -l 36-56-123
sufword lige- 123-24-12456-36
prfword -med 36-146-145
prfword -m 36-56-134
sufword med- 146-145-36
prfword -men 36-134-126
sufword men- 134-126-36
prfword -ned 36-1246-145
sufword ned- 1246-145-36
prfword -når 36-1345-16-1235
prfword -n 36-56-1345
sufword når- 1345-16-1235-36
prfword -op 36-135-1234
prfword -o 36-56-135
sufword op- 135-1234-36
prfword -over 36-135-1236-156
prfword -x 36-56-1346
sufword over- 135-1236-156-36
prfword -på 36-1234-16
prfword -p 36-56-1234
sufword på- 1234-16-36
midword -på- 36-1234-36
prfword -ret 36-1235-346
sufword ret- 1235-346-36
midword -ret- 36-12356-36
prfword -à 36-56-12356
prfword -rigtig 36-1235-35-2345-35
prfword -r 36-56-1235
sufword rigtig- 1235-35-2345-35-36
midword -rigtig- 36-1235-36
prfword -skal 36-123456-1-123
sufword skal- 123456-1-123-36
midword -skal- 36-123456-36
prfword -é 36-56-123456
prfword -som 36-234-135-134
prfword -s 36-56-234
sufword som- 234-135-134-36
midword -som- 36-234-36
prfword -så 36-234-16
prfword -å 36-56-16
sufword så- 234-16-36
prfword -til 36-2345-24-123
prfword -t 36-56-2345
sufword til- 2345-24-123-36
midword -til- 36-2345-36
prfword -under 36-136-1345-23456
sufword under- 136-1345-23456-36
midword -under- 36-12345-36
prfword -var 36-1236-1-1235
sufword var- 1236-1-1235-36
midword -var- 36-3456-36
prfword -ved 36-1236-15-145
prfword -v 36-56-1236
sufword ved- 1236-15-145-36
midword -ved- 36-1236-36


### Context rules - forward translation

# Exclamation at beginning of string
noback context `["!"] @56-235

# Ensure two dashes where appropriate.
noback context $w["-"]$w @36
noback context $sw["-"]"\xf800\xf801" @36
noback context $sw["-"]$sw @36-36
noback context `["-"]$sw @36-36
noback context $sw["-"]~ @36-36
noback context !$sw["-"]~ @36
noback context `["-"]~ @36-36

# Ensure letsign between letter and numsign
noback context $l[]$D @56


### context - backward translation

# Ensure the correct number of dashes
nofor context @36[@36-36] "--"
nofor context [@36-36]@36 "--"
nofor context $w[@36-36]$w "--"
nofor context $sw[@36-36]$sw "-"
nofor context `[@36-36]$sw "-"
nofor context $sw[@36-36]~ "-"
nofor context `@36-36~ "-"


### Pass 2 - forward translation

# No "nd", "hv", "or", or "st" after a digit and a letsign
noback pass2 @234f-123f-2456 @56-125-1236
noback pass2 @234f-123f-12345 @56-1345-145
noback pass2 @234f-123f-1346 @56-135-1235
noback pass2 @234f-123f-1356 @56-234-2345
noback pass2 @234f-123f-1256 @56-2345-15
# extra lines to correct hyphenation errors caused by \xf801
noback pass2 @234f-123f-135-3456-1235 @56-135-1236-156
noback pass2 @234f-123f-3456 @56-1236-15

noback pass2 @234f-123f @56

# Correct chars defined as 8 dots because they include letsign
noback pass2 @467 @45-23
noback pass2 @4568 @45-456
noback pass2 @123457 @56-12345
noback pass2 @24567 @56-2456
noback pass2 @13467 @56-1346
noback pass2 @13567 @56-1356
noback pass2 @123567 @56-12356
noback pass2 @23467 @56-2346
noback pass2 @1234567 @56-123456
noback pass2 @12567 @56-1256

#special case for www
noback pass2 @24567-24567-24567 @2456-2456-2456

noback pass2 @56-5 @5 # no letsign before letters with accent
noback pass2 @56-6-5 @6-5 # no letsign before cap letters with accent
noback pass2 @234f-123f-6-5 @6-5 # no letsign before cap letters with accent
noback pass2 _$D[@56-6-56] *
noback pass2 _$D[@56-6] *

### Pass 2 - backward

#special case for www
nofor pass2 @2456-2456-2456 @24567-24567-24567

### Pass 3 - forward translation
noback pass3 @56-6-56 @56-6 # Ensure correct order and no double letsign
noback pass3 @6-56 @56-6 # Ensure correct order

# Ensure there is only one letsign
noback pass3 @56-56 @56

# Ensure there is only one emphasis sign
noback pass3 @46-46 @46
noback pass3 @46-46-46 @46

### Pass 3 - backward translation

# Save letters that have been defined with letsign as part of their definitions
nofor pass3 @56-6-12345 @6-123457
nofor pass3 @56-12345 @123457
nofor pass3 @56-6-2456 @6-24567
nofor pass3 @56-2456 @24567
nofor pass3 @56-6-1346 @6-13467
nofor pass3 @56-1346 @13467
nofor pass3 @56-6-1356 @6-13567
nofor pass3 @56-1356 @13567
nofor pass3 @56-6-12356 @6-123567
nofor pass3 @56-12356 @123567
nofor pass3 @56-6-2346 @6-23467
nofor pass3 @56-2346 @23467
nofor pass3 @56-6-123456 @6-1234567
nofor pass3 @56-123456 @1234567
nofor pass3 @56-6-1256 @6-12567
nofor pass3 @56-1256 @12567

# save ~ and |  before inserting extra letsigns and endcapsword in pass 2.
nofor pass3 @45-23 @467 # Create alternative representation of "~"
nofor pass3 @45-456 @4568

# Include hyphenation file as the last thing
include da-dk-g2.dic
